New Mexico, session 2026, SB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environment for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 to assess and clean up abandoned or neglected contaminated sites, including abandoned uranium mining sites, across the state that do not have viable responsible parties to fund and conduct cleanup actions. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -